Missouri, session 2026, HB2396.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 169.596, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 169.596, to read as follows:
169.596. 1. Except as provided under subsection 5 of this section and
notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a retired certificated
teacher receiving a retirement benefit from the retirement system established pursuant to
sections 169.010 to 169.141 may, without losing his or her retirement benefit, teach full time
for up to four years for a school district covered by such retirement system; provided that the
school district has a shortage of certified teachers, as determined by the school district, and
provided that no such retired certificated teacher shall be employed as a superintendent. The
total number of such retired certificated teachers shall not exceed, at any one time, the greater
of one percent of the total certificated teachers and noncertificated staff for that school
district, or five certificated teachers.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a person
receiving a retirement benefit from the retirement system established pursuant to sections
169.600 to 169.715 may, without losing his or her retirement benefit, be employed full time
for up to four years for a school district covered by such retirement system; provided that the
school district has a shortage of noncertificated employees, as determined by the school
district. The total number of such retired noncertificated employees shall not exceed, at any
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2396 2
one time, the lesser of ten percent of the total noncertificated staff for that school district, or
five employees.
3. The employer's contribution rate shall be paid by the hiring school district.
4. In order to hire teachers and noncertificated employees pursuant to the provisions
of subsections 2 and 3 of this section, the school district shall:
(1) Show a good faith effort to fill positions with nonretired certificated teachers or
nonretired noncertificated employees;
(2) Post the vacancy for at least one month;
(3) Have not offered early retirement incentives for either of the previous two years;
(4) Solicit applications through the local newspaper, other media, or teacher
education programs;
(5) Determine there is an insufficient number of eligible applicants for the advertised
position; and
(6) Declare a critical shortage of certificated teachers or noncertificated employees
that is active for one year.
5. (1) For all school years beginning on or after the July first immediately
following compliance with the provisions of section 105.684, but no earlier than July 1,
2027, a retired certificated teacher receiving a retirement benefit from the retirement
system established under sections 169.010 to 169.141 may, without losing his or her
retirement benefit, teach full time for a school district in a position covered by such
retirement system, provided that no such retired certificated teacher shall be employed
in administration.
(2) Such person shall not contribute to the retirement system because of earnings
during such period of employment, and such person shall not earn membership service
for such employment. The employer's contribution rate for such person shall be paid by
the hiring school district into the retirement system established by sections 169.010 to
169.141.
(3) The employer shall compensate a person hired under the provisions of this
section at the salary commensurate with the salary of an individual with similar years of
experience and level of education on such district's salary schedule for such position
filled by the retiree, or comparable position if the position did not exist, without a
discontinuance of the person's retirement allowance, provided that such salary may be
reduced by an amount equal to the percentage of the employee retirement contribution
rate for such individual.
(4) If the employer does not utilize a salary schedule or if the position in question
is not subject to the employer's salary schedule, the employer shall set the compensation
for such retiree at the tier of the salary limit that the school board of the employer set

HB 2396 3
for the position that has been submitted and approved by the board of trustees of the
retirement system and is commensurate with the salary of an individual with similar
years of experience and level of education, provided that such salary may be reduced by
an amount equal to the percentage of the employee retirement contribution rate for such
individual.
6. Any person hired pursuant to this section shall be included in the State Directory of
New Hires for purposes of income and eligibility verification pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section
1320b-7.
✔